Massachusetts, session 194th, S2411.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 32G of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after line 239 the following sentence:- 
The registrar may approve a driver education curriculum presented in a virtual instructor-
led format by a state-licensed driving school if the following conditions are met:- (a) the driving 
school owns or leases physical offices and/or classrooms in the Commonwealth to provide in-
person instruction  (b) the driving school has no less than three consecutive years of operation in 
the Commonwealth (c) the driving school is in good standing with the Registry of Motor 
Vehicles.